Connecticut, session 2026, HB05472.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Major incident" means any event at a facility described in
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 16-50i of the general statutes
that (A) requires an emergency shutoff of electricity flowing to or from
such facility due to a hazardous condition at such facility, (B) requires
any local emergency services personnel to respond to the site of such
facility, or (C) causes injury requiring hospitalization to any person; and
(2) "Minor incident" means any unanticipated or unplanned
shutdown of a facility described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of
section 16-50i of the general statutes that does not require any local
emergency services personnel to respond to the site of such facility.
"Minor incident" does not include the shutdown of such facility in
connection with scheduled or routine maintenance.
(b) Any person who receives a certificate from the Connecticut Siting
Council to operate a facility described in subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 16-50i of the general statutes shall report any major
incident or minor incident at such facility in a form and manner
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5472
prescribed by the council. Any major incident shall be reported not later
than five days after the occurrence of such incident, and any minor
incident shall be reported not later than thirty days after the occurrence
of such incident.
(c) Commencing on July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Connecticut Siting Council shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, detailing any reports
the council has received pursuant to this section in the preceding year
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to energy and technology.
Sec. 2. Section 16-50l of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
amended by adding subsections (i) and (j) as follows (Effective October 1,
2026):
(NEW) (i) In addition to the requirements of this section, the council
may, in the council's discretion, require that, as a condition of approval
for any facility described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section
16-50i, the applicant provide emergency services training specific to the
proposed facility, at the applicant's sole expense, to firefighters or other
emergency services personnel in any municipality in which such facility
shall be located. If the council imposes such a condition pursuant to this
subsection, the applicant shall provide notice of the availability of such
training to the chief executive officer and fire marshal of any
municipality in which such facility shall be located, as ordered by the
council. The chief executive officer or fire marshal shall respond in
writing to such notice not later than sixty days after the receipt of such
notice and indicate whether firefighters or other emergency services
personnel in the municipality request such training. If such training is
so requested, the applicant will arrange for such training to be provided
not later than sixty days after such request.
(NEW) (j) (1) For the purposes of this subsection, "emergency contact
person" means a person, including an entity or an organization,
designated by an applicant or certificate holder pursuant to this section,
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5472
who has authority to act on behalf of the applicant or certificate holder
in the event of an emergency at a facility described in subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of section 16-50i. As a condition of approval under this
section, an applicant shall (A) designate an emergency contact person
for such facility, (B) provide the contact information for such emergency
contact person to the council and both the chief executive officer and the
local fire official of any municipality in which such facility is located,
and (C) post a sign at each entrance to such facility displaying the
contact information for such emergency contact person.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2027, any certificate holder that owns or
operates a facility described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of
section 16-50i shall (A) designate an emergency contact person, (B)
provide the contact information for such emergency contact person, in
writing, to the council and both the chief executive officer and the local
fire official of any municipality in which such facility is located, and (C)
post a sign at each entrance to the facility displaying the contact
information for such emergency contact person.
(3) If the person, entity or organization designated as the emergency
contact person pursuant to this subsection has changed, or the contact
information for such emergency contact person has changed, the
applicant or certificate holder shall, not later than thirty days after such
change, (A) provide written notice of such change to the council and
both the chief executive officer and the local fire official of any
municipality in which such facility is located, and (B) update each sign
at the facility displaying the contact information for the emergency
contact person.
(4) Any person designated as an emergency contact person pursuant
to this subsection shall be available to respond to any emergency at such
facility not later than one hour after the occurrence of such emergency.
If an emergency contact person fails to timely respond in the event of an
emergency at such facility, any firefighter or other emergency services
personnel who attempted to contact the emergency contact person shall
file a written report with the council detailing such lack of response.
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5472
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than November
1, 2026, the chairperson of the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection and the Connecticut Siting Council, shall convene a working
group within the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority for the purpose
of reviewing and assessing any processes concerning the resumption of
electric generation services after a shutoff of such services at any facility
described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 16-50i of the
general statutes that exceeds five days. Such review and assessment
shall consider (1) any existing statutory, regulatory or contractual
processes governing the resumption of electric generation services
following an extended shutoff; (2) the adequacy of coordination among
electric generation facility owners or operators, electric distribution
companies, regional transmission organizations and state agencies; (3)
potential risks to public safety or electric grid reliability associated with
extended shutoffs and subsequent resumption of service; and (4) any
recommendations for statutory, regulatory or procedural changes to
100 improve transparency, coordination and safety upon the resumption of
101 such services.
102 (b) The working group shall include:
103 (1) The chairperson of the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, or
104 the chairperson's designee;
105 (2) The chairperson of the Connecticut Siting Council, or the
106 chairperson's designee;
107 (3) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, or
108 the commissioner's designee;
109 (4) One or more representatives from an electric distribution
110 company, as defined in section 16-1 of the general statutes;
111 (5) One or more owners or operators of an electric generation facility
112 described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 16-50i of the
113 general statutes;
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5472
114 (6) A person employed by an institution of higher education in the
115 state, who has expertise in electrical engineering or any field related to
116 the generation, transmission or distribution of electricity;
117 (7) The Consumer Counsel, or the counsel's designee; and
118 (8) Any other interested party the chairperson deems appropriate.
119 (c) Not later than February 1, 2027, the chairperson of the Public
120 Utilities Regulatory Authority shall, in accordance with the provisions
121 of section 11-4a of the general statutes, submit a report on the efforts of
122 such working group and any recommendations to the joint standing
123 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
124 relating to energy and technology and public safety.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 16-50l(i) and (j)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2, instances of "chief executive official" were changed to "chief
executive officer" for conformity with the general statutes.
ET Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5